Illinois, session 104th, HB1429.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Bill of Rights for the Homeless Act is 5amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (775 ILCS 45/10)7    Sec. 10. Bill of Rights. 8    (a) No person's rights, privileges, or access to public 9services may be denied or abridged solely because he or she is 10homeless. Such a person shall be granted the same rights and 11privileges as any other citizen of this State. A person 12experiencing homelessness has the following rights: 13        (1) the right to use and move freely in public spaces, 14    including but not limited to public sidewalks, public 15    parks, public transportation, and public buildings, in the 16    same manner as any other person and without discrimination 17    on the basis of his or her housing status; 18        (2) the right to equal treatment by all State and 19    municipal agencies, without discrimination on the basis of 20    housing status; 21        (3) the right not to face discrimination while 22    maintaining employment due to his or her lack of permanent 23    mailing address, or his or her mailing address being that   HB1429- 2 -LRB104 06164 JRC 16198 b1    of a shelter or social service provider; 2        (4) the right to emergency medical care free from 3    discrimination based on his or her housing status; 4        (5) the right to vote, register to vote, and receive 5    documentation necessary to prove identity for voting 6    without discrimination due to his or her housing status; 7        (6) the right to protection from disclosure of his or 8    her records and information provided to homeless shelters 9    and service providers to State, municipal, and private 10    entities without appropriate legal authority; and the 11    right to confidentiality of personal records and 12    information in accordance with all limitations on 13    disclosure established by the federal Homeless Management 14    Information Systems, the federal Health Insurance 15    Portability and Accountability Act, and the federal 16    Violence Against Women Act; and 17        (7) the right to a reasonable expectation of privacy 18    in his or her personal property to the same extent as 19    personal property in a permanent residence. 20    (b) As used in this Act: , 21    "Enforcing entity" means the State or a unit of local 22government as well as their representatives. 23    "Housing housing status" means the status of having or not 24having a fixed or regular residence, including the status of 25living on the streets, in a shelter, or in a temporary 26residence.   HB1429- 3 -LRB104 06164 JRC 16198 b1    "Life-sustaining activities" includes, but are not limited 2to, moving, resting, sitting, standing, lying down, sleeping, 3protecting oneself from the elements, eating, drinking, and 4storing such personal property as needed to shelter oneself.5    "Unsheltered homelessness" means the status of not having 6a fixed or regular residence, including the status of living 7on the streets because of a lack of access to a legally 8operated indoor shelter or other temporary residence that is 9appropriate and safe.10    "Notice" in this instance is met when:11        Written notice: Notification by the enforcing entity 12    in a conspicuous location 7 days before enforcement at the 13    site of removal, including, but not limited to, at the 14    entrance of the area or near the site and if possible on 15    the belongings of the unsheltered person.16        Verbal notice shall be provided if the enforcing 17    entity's representatives and persons subject to 18    enforcement are present at a location simultaneously 19    during the 7-day time period.20    (c) Neither the State or any unit of local government may 21establish or enforce ordinances or policies that include fines 22or criminal penalties against people experiencing unsheltered 23homelessness for occupying or engaging in life-sustaining 24activities on public property.25    (d) Subject to other provisions of this Act, the State or a 26unit of local government may enforce ordinances, policies, or   HB1429- 4 -LRB104 06164 JRC 16198 b1procedures without fines or criminal penalties against people 2experiencing unsheltered homelessness to maintain public 3access to a property or address serious and imminent risks to 4public health and safety.5    (e) Unless the enforcing entity determines that there is 6an emergency related to public access to a property or public 7health and safety, before enforcing any such ordinances, 8policies and procedures, the enforcing entity shall provide 9notice, as defined under this Section, to persons subject to 10the enforcement. All enforcement under this Section shall 11comply with the Community Emergency Services and Support Act 12and other sections of this Act. The enforcing entity shall 13make, without limitation, a good faith effort to provide or 14refer persons subject to enforcement with transportation, 15social services, and other resources to remedy their immediate 16shelter and long-term housing needs.17    (f) In determining whether an actual emergency exists, the 18enforcing entity shall declare an emergency only when there is 19an imminent risk to individuals or community members that can 20only be mitigated by requiring unsheltered individuals to move 21themselves or their belongings. In emergencies, as much notice 22as is practicable shall be provided. The enforcing entity 23shall make, without limitation, a good faith effort to also 24provide or refer persons subject to enforcement with 25transportation, social services, and other resources to remedy 26their immediate shelter and long-term housing needs.  HB1429- 5 -LRB104 06164 JRC 16198 b1    (g) It is an affirmative defense to a charge of violating a 2statute or ordinance criminalizing one or more life-sustaining 3activities that the individual was experiencing unsheltered 4homelessness. It shall be the responsibility of the court to 5notify the charged individual of the availability of this 6defense and how to raise it. Once the defense is raised, there 7is a rebuttable presumption that the person was experiencing 8unsheltered homelessness and the burden of proving otherwise 9is on the prosecution.10    (h) A home rule unit may not enact rules or regulations 11that are inconsistent with this Section. This amendatory Act 12is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article 13VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by 14home rule units of powers and functions exercised by the 15State. 16(Source: P.A. 98-516, eff. 8-22-13.)